Washington statutes.
RCW 19.220.005

Intent.

The legislature intends to provide increased consumer awareness on the part of persons living abroad regarding Washington residents who utilize international matchmaking services for purposes of establishing relationships with those living abroad. The legislature recognizes that persons living abroad are already required to provide background information to the federal government during visa applications, but, unlike residents of the United States, are unlikely to have the means to access and fully verify personal history information about prospective spouses residing in the United States. The legislature does not intend to impede the ability of any person to establish a marital or romantic relationship, but rather to increase the ability of persons living abroad to make informed decisions about Washington residents.

The legislature does not intend to adversely impact in any way those businesses who offer international matchmaking services on a not for fee basis.

[ 2002 c 115 s 1.]